punctuation.lexc
! This file contains punctuation symbols, it is unioned
! with the main morphological transducer for those applications
! that also need punctuation to receive analyses.

Multichar_Symbols

%+punct
%+clb
%+cm

LEXICON Root

%;+punct:%; # ;
%,+cm:%, # ;
%.+punct+clb:%. # ;
…+punct:… # ;
%:+punct+clb:%: # ;
%?+punct+clb:%? # ;
%!+punct+clb:%! # ;
